italian.aff
   .    > OTTANTASETTESIME
   .    > OTTANTOTTESIMO
   .    > OTTANTOTTESIMI
   .    > OTTANTOTTESIMA
   .    > OTTANTOTTESIME
   .    > OTTANTANOVESIMO
   .    > OTTANTANOVESIMI
   .    > OTTANTANOVESIMA
   .    > OTTANTANOVESIME
   O    > TTANTESIMO
   O    > TTANTESIMI
   O    > TTANTESIMA
   O    > TTANTESIME
   O    > TTANTUNESIMO
   O    > TTANTUNESIMI
   O    > TTANTUNESIMA
   O    > TTANTUNESIME
   O    > TTANTADUESIMO
   O    > TTANTADUESIMI
   O    > TTANTADUESIMA
   O    > TTANTADUESIME
   O    > TTANTATREESIMO
   O    > TTANTATREESIMI
   O    > TTANTATREESIMA
   O    > TTANTATREESIME
   O    > TTANTAQUATTRESIMO
   O    > TTANTAQUATTRESIMI
   O    > TTANTAQUATTRESIMA
   O    > TTANTAQUATTRESIME
   O    > TTANTACINQUESIMO
   O    > TTANTACINQUESIMI
   O    > TTANTACINQUESIMA
   O    > TTANTACINQUESIME
   O    > TTANTOTTESIMO
   O    > TTANTOTTESIMI
   O    > TTANTOTTESIMA
   O    > TTANTOTTESIME
   O    > TTANTASETTESIMO
   O    > TTANTASETTESIMI
   O    > TTANTASETTESIMA
   O    > TTANTASETTESIME
   O    > TTANTASEIESIMO
   O    > TTANTASEIESIMI
   O    > TTANTASEIESIMA
   O    > TTANTASEIESIME
   O    > TTANTANOVESIMO
   O    > TTANTANOVESIMI
   O    > TTANTANOVESIMA
   O    > TTANTANOVESIME
   .    > NOVANTESIMO
   .    > NOVANTESIMI
   .    > NOVANTESIMA
   .    > NOVANTESIME
   .    > NOVANTUNESIMO
   .    > NOVANTUNESIMI
   .    > NOVANTUNESIMA
   .    > NOVANTUNESIME
   .    > NOVANTADUESIMO
   .    > NOVANTADUESIMI
   .    > NOVANTADUESIMA
   .    > NOVANTADUESIME
   .    > NOVANTATREESIMO
   .    > NOVANTATREESIMI
   .    > NOVANTATREESIMA
   .    > NOVANTATREESIME
   .    > NOVANTAQUATTRESIMO
   .    > NOVANTAQUATTRESIMI
   .    > NOVANTAQUATTRESIMA
   .    > NOVANTAQUATTRESIME
   .    > NOVANTACINQUESIMO
   .    > NOVANTACINQUESIMI
   .    > NOVANTACINQUESIMA
   .    > NOVANTACINQUESIME
   .    > NOVANTASEIESIMO
   .    > NOVANTASEIESIMI
   .    > NOVANTASEIESIMA
   .    > NOVANTASEIESIME
   .    > NOVANTASETTESIMO
   .    > NOVANTASETTESIMI
   .    > NOVANTASETTESIMA
   .    > NOVANTASETTESIME
   .    > NOVANTOTTESIMO
   .    > NOVANTOTTESIMI
   .    > NOVANTOTTESIMA
   .    > NOVANTOTTESIME
   .    > NOVANTANOVESIMO
   .    > NOVANTANOVESIMI
   .    > NOVANTANOVESIMA
   .    > NOVANTANOVESIME

flag \):
   I    > -I,ENNE
   I    > -I,ENNI
   [EOA]    > NNE
   [EOA]    > NNI

flag \=:
   I    > -I,UNENNE
   I    > -I,UNENNI
   A    > -A,UNENNE
   A    > -A,UNENNI
   O    > -O,UNENNE
   O    > -O,UNENNI
   .    > DUENNE
   .    > DUENNI
   .    > TREENNE
   .    > TREENNI
   .    > QUATTRENNE
   .    > QUATTRENNI
   .    > CINQUENNE
   .    > CINQUENNI
   .    > SEIENNE
   .    > SEIENNI
   .    > SETTENNE
   .    > SETTENNI
   .    > OTTENNE
   .    > OTTENNI
   O    > TTENNE
   O    > TTENNI
   .    > NOVENNE
   .    > NOVENNI


prefixes

flag z:
   [^I] > RI
   I    > R

flag w:
   .    > RE

flag y:
   .    > STRA

flag x:
   .    > PRE

flag ":
   .    > MILLE
   .    > DUEMILA
   .    > TREMILA
   .    > QUATTROMILA
   .    > CINQUEMILA
   .    > SEIMILA
   .    > SETTEMILA
   .    > OTTOMILA
   .    > NOVEMILA
   .    > DIECIMILA
   .    > UNDICIMILA
   .    > DODICIMILA
   .    > TREDICIMILA
   .    > QUATTORDICIMILA
   .    > QUINDICIMILA
   .    > SEDICIMILA
   .    > DICIASSETTEMILA
   .    > DICIOTTOMILA
   .    > DICIANNOVEMILA
   .    > VENTIMILA
   .    > VENTUNMILA
   .    > VENTIDUEMILA
   .    > VENTITREMILA
   .    > VENTIQUATTROMILA
   .    > VENTICINQUEMILA
   .    > VENTISEIMILA
   .    > VENTISETTEMILA
   .    > VENTOTTOMILA
   .    > VENTINOVEMILA
   .    > TRENTAMILA
   .    > TRENTUNMILA
   .    > TRENTADUEMILA
   .    > TRENTATREMILA
   .    > TRENTAQUATTROMILA
   .    > TRENTACINQUEMILA
   .    > TRENTASEIMILA
   .    > TRENTASETTEMILA
   .    > TRENTOTTOMILA
   .    > TRENTANOVEMILA
   .    > QUARANTAMILA
   .    > QUARANTUNMILA
   .    > QUARANTADUEMILA
   .    > QUARANTATREMILA
   .    > QUARANTAQUATTROMILA
   .    > QUARANTACINQUEMILA
   .    > QUARANTASEIMILA
   .    > QUARANTASETTEMILA
   .    > QUARANTOTTOMILA
   .    > QUARANTANOVEMILA
   .    > CINQUANTAMILA
   .    > CINQUANTUNMILA
   .    > CINQUANTADUEMILA
   .    > CINQUANTATREMILA
   .    > CINQUANTAQUATTROMILA
   .    > CINQUANTACINQUEMILA
   .    > CINQUANTASEIMILA
   .    > CINQUANTASETTEMILA
   .    > CINQUANTOTTOMILA
   .    > CINQUANTANOVEMILA
   .    > SESSANTAMILA
   .    > SESSANTUNMILA
   .    > SESSANTADUEMILA
   .    > SESSANTATREMILA
   .    > SESSANTAQUATTROMILA
   .    > SESSANTACINQUEMILA
   .    > SESSANTASEIMILA
   .    > SESSANTASETTEMILA
   .    > SESSANTOTTOMILA
   .    > SESSANTANOVEMILA
   .    > SETTANTAMILA
   .    > SETTANTUNMILA
   .    > SETTANTADUEMILA
   .    > SETTANTATREMILA
   .    > SETTANTAQUATTROMILA
   .    > SETTANTACINQUEMILA
   .    > SETTANTASEIMILA
   .    > SETTANTASETTEMILA
   .    > SETTANTOTTOMILA
   .    > SETTANTANOVEMILA
   .    > OTTANTAMILA
   .    > OTTANTUNMILA
   .    > OTTANTADUEMILA
   .    > OTTANTATREMILA
   .    > OTTANTAQUATTROMILA
   .    > OTTANTACINQUEMILA
   .    > OTTANTASEIMILA
   .    > OTTANTASETTEMILA
   .    > OTTANTOTTOMILA
   .    > OTTANTANOVEMILA
   .    > NOVANTAMILA
   .    > NOVANTUNMILA
   .    > NOVANTADUEMILA
   .    > NOVANTATREMILA
   .    > NOVANTAQUATTROMILA
   .    > NOVANTACINQUEMILA
   .    > NOVANTASEIMILA
   .    > NOVANTASETTEMILA
   .    > NOVANTOTTOMILA
   .    > NOVANTANOVEMILA

flag $:
   [CL]    > X
   X    > L
   [XLCDM]    > C
   [LC]    > CX
   X    > CL
   [XLC]    > CC
   [LC]    > CCX
   X    > CCL
   [XL]    > CCC
   [LC]    > CCCX
   X    > CCCL
   [XL]    > CD
   [LC]    > CDX
   X    > CDL
   [XLC]    > D
   [LC]    > DX
   X    > DL
   [XLC]    > DC
   [LC]    > DCX
   X    > DCL
   [XLC]    > DCC
   [LC]    > DCCX
   X    > DCCL
   [XL]    > DCCC
   [LC]    > DCCCX
   X    > DCCCL
   [XL]    > CM
   [LC]    > CMX
   X    > CML
   [XLCDM]    > M
   [LC]    > MX
   X    > ML
   [XLCMD]    > MC
   [LC]    > MCX
   X    > MCL
   [XLC]    > MCC
   [LC]    > MCCX
   X    > MCCL
   [XL]    > MCCC
   [LC]    > MCCCX
   X    > MCCCL
   [XL]    > MCD
   [LC]    > MCDX
   X    > MCDL
   [XLC]    > MD
   [LC]    > MDX
   X    > MDL
   [XLC]    > MDC
   [LC]    > MDCX
   X    > MDCL
   [XLC]    > MDCC
   [LC]    > MDCCX
   X    > MDCCL
   [XL]    > MDCCC
   [LC]    > MDCCCX
   X    > MDCCCL
   [XL]    > MCM
   [LC]    > MCMX
   X    > MCML
   [XLC]    > MM
   [LC]    > MMX
   X    > MML


# legenda abbreviazioni nei commenti:

# cd.p. = condizionale presente
# cg.i. = congiuntivo imperfetto
# cg.p. = congiuntivo presente
# compl. = complemento
# f. = femminile
# f.s. = futuro semplice
# ger. = gerundio presente
# inf. = infinito presente
# impf. = imperfetto
# impr. = imperativo
# m. = maschile
# ogg. = oggetto
# p.pass. = participio passato
# p.pres. = participio presente
# p.r. = passato remoto
# pl. = plurale
# pr. = persona
# pres. = presente
# rif. = riflessivo
# sn. = singolare
# term. = termine
# v. = vedere
