italian.dict
accaparrare/ABCGKOSVY1z
accelerare/ABCGKOSVY1z
accreditamento/az
accreditare/ABCGKOSVY1z
addestrare/ABCGKOSVY1z
aggregare/ABCGKOSVY1z
allegare/ABCGKOSVY1z
allungare/ABCGKOSVY1z
ammogliare/ABCGKOSVY1z
analizzare/ABCGKOSVY1z
andantesi/z
andantisi/z
andavasi/z
apparsi/z
appassionare/ABCGKOSVY1z
appisolare/ABCGKOSVY1z
arrestare/ABCGKOSVY1z
asfaltare/ABCGKOSVY1z
attrarre/ABCGKOSVY1z
attraversare/ABCGKOSVY1z
avvisare/ABCGKOSVY1z
avvistare/ABCGKOSVY1z
azzuffare/ABCGKOSVY1z
babelico/gx
benediceva/xyz
benedicevamo/xyz
benedicevano/xyz
benedicevate/xyz
benedicevi/xyz
benedicevo/xyz
benedii/xyz
benedisti/xyz
benedizione/axyz
c/£$
cambrico/gx
canceroso/fx
catturare/ABCGKOSVY1z
cedere/ABCGKOSVY1x
celebrare/ABCGKOSVY1z
cintare/ABCGKOSVY1z
classificare/ABCGKOSVY1z
codificare/ABCGKOSVY1z
cognitivo/fx
collocamento/az
colombiano/fx
colorare/ABCGKOSVY1z
combinare/ABCGKOSVY1z
comparsi/z
compattamento/az
compilare/ABCGKOSVY1x
componimento/az
comporre/ABCGKOSVY1z
concordatario/fx
condannare/ABCGKOSVY1z
configurare/ABCGKOSVY1x
conformare/ABCGKOSVY1z
confrontare/ABCGKOSVY1z
congelamento/az
congelare/ABCGKOSVY1z
conscio/fkx
consonantico/gx
contattare/ABCGKOSVY1z
contraddiceva/xyz
contraddicevamo/xyz
contraddicevano/xyz
contraddicevate/xyz
contraddicevi/xyz
contraddicevo/xyz
contrarre/ABCGKOSVY1z
controllare/ABCGKOSVY1z
convalidare/ABCGKOSVY1z
copersero/z
coricare/ABCGKOSVY1z
correggere/ABDGKOSVY1z
correre/ABDGKOSVY1x
corso/afx
d/£$
dantesco/fkx
decorare/ABCGKOSVY1z
diceva/xz
dicevamo/xz
dicevano/xz
dicevate/xz
dicevi/xz
dicevo/xyz
digeribilità/x
disdiceva/xyz
disdicevamo/xyz
disdicevano/xyz
disdicevate/xyz
disdicevi/xyz
disdicevo/xyz
dispiegare/ABCGKOSVY1z
disporre/ABCGKOSVY1z
distillare/ABCGKOSVY1z
eccolo/fz
edito/fz
emigrare/ABCGKOSVY1z
esaltare/ABCGKOSVY1z
esporre/ABCGKOSVY1z
estrarre/ABCGKOSVY1z
fatto/ahz
fellone/x
fiatare/ABCGKOSVY1z
focalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1z
forgiare/ABCGKOSVY1z
formattare/ABCGKOSVY1z
frullare/ABCGKOSVY1z
fuso/az
germinare/ABCGKOSVY1z
giottesco/fx
impossessare/ABCGKOSVY1z
indice/axy
indiceva/xy
indicevamo/xy
indicevano/xy
indicevate/xy
indicevi/xy
indicevo/xy
inghiottiscicelo/fz
inghiottiscicene/z
inghiottiscici/z
inghiottiscigli/z
inghiottisciglielo/fz
inghiottiscigliene/z
inghiottiscilo/fz
inghiottiscimelo/fz
inghiottiscimene/z
inghiottiscimi/z
inghiottiscine/z
inghiottiscitelo/fz
inghiottiscitene/z
inghiottisciti/z
installare/ABCGKOSVY1x
interdiceva/xy
interdicevamo/xy
interdicevano/xy
interdicevate/xy
interdicevi/xy
interdicevo/xy
l/£$
legatario/fx
m/£$
malediceva/xyz
maledicevamo/xyz
maledicevano/xyz
maledicevate/xyz
maledicevi/xyz
maledicevo/xyz
maledii/xyz
mappare/ABCGKOSVY1z
maritare/ABCGKOSVY1z
modulare/ABCGKOSVY1z
mostrare/ABCGKOSVY1z
operando/gz
operare/ABCGKOSVY1z
ordinando/gx
ordinare/ABCGKOSVY1x
oscurare/ABCGKOSVY1z
ottenibilità/z
ottenimento/az
partizionare/ABCGKOSVY1z
penetrare/ABCGKOSVY1z
perdonare/ABCGKOSVY1z
pestare/ABCGKOSVY1z
pettinare/ABCGKOSVY1z
piantare/ABCGKOSVY1z
porgere/ABDGKOSVY1z
porre/ABCGKOSVY1z
portare/ABCGKOSVY1z
preporre/ABCGKOSVY1z
presentare/ABCGKOSVY1z
profondare/ABCGKOSVY1z
proporre/ABCGKOSVY1z
pungere/ABDGKOSVY1z
riepilogativo/fkz
scederci/z
scedergli/z
scendilo/fz
scendine/z
scientifico/gkx
scorrere/ABCGKOSVY1z
seminare/ABCGKOSVY1z
sotterrare/ABCGKOSVY1z
stretto/fhkz
stucche/z
tappare/ABCGKOSVY1z
telefonare/ABCGKOSVY1z
tradurre/ABCGKOSVY1z
traduzione/az
trasportare/ABCGKOSVY1z
tuffare/ABCGKOSVY1z
turare/ABCGKOSVY1z
ungere/ABDGKOSVY1z
usabilità/z
vaccinare/ABCGKOSVY1z
valicare/ABCGKOSVY1z
virare/ABCGKOSVY1z
vivificare/ABCGKOSVY1z
vogare/ABCGKOSVY1z
volare/ABCGKOSVY1z
x/£$
xx/£$
xxx/£$
